District of Columbia statutes.
25-403

License renewal application for manufacturer, wholesaler, or retailer.

(a)

An applicant for license renewal shall verify, by affidavit, the accuracy of its application, including all documents and submissions constituting a part of the application for its initial license or, if appropriate, at the time of a Board-approved substantial change in operation.

(b)

In the case of an application for renewal of a restaurant or hotel license, the applicant shall present evidence establishing that the sale of food accounted for at least 45% of gross annual receipts from the operation of the restaurant or of the dining room of the hotel during the current license period.

(c)

The applicant shall submit documents or other written evidence establishing to the satisfaction of the Board that the applicant has complied with the requirements of § 25-423.

(d)

The Board shall establish application procedures for the renewal of a caterer’s license under § 25-211(b).

(e)

(1)

In the case of an application for renewal of a nightclub license, the applicant shall submit a written security plan.

(2)

In the case of an application for renewal for a restaurant, tavern, or multipurpose facility license, the Board may, in its sound discretion, require that the applicant submit a written security plan.

(3)

A written security plan filed pursuant to this subsection shall include at least the following elements:

(A)

A statement on the type of security training provided for, and completed by, establishment personnel, including:

(i)

Conflict resolution training;

(ii)

Procedures for handling violent incidents, other emergencies, and calling the Metropolitan Police Department; and

(iii)

Procedures for crowd control and preventing overcrowding;

(B)

The establishment’s procedures for permitting patrons to enter;

(C)

A description of how security personnel are stationed inside and in front of the establishment and the number and location of cameras used by the establishment;

(D)

Procedures in place to prevent patrons from becoming intoxicated and ensuring that only persons 21 years or older are served alcohol;

(E)

A description of how the establishment maintains an incident log;

(F)

The establishment’s procedures for preserving a crime scene; and

(G)

In the event that cameras are required to be installed by the Board or in accordance with the establishment’s security plan, the establishment shall ensure the following:

(i)

The cameras utilized by the establishment are operational;

(ii)

Any footage of a crime of violence or a crime involving a gun is maintained for a minimum of 30 days; and

(iii)

The security footage is made available within 48 hours upon the request of ABRA or the Metropolitan Police Department.

Jan. 24, 1934, 48 Stat. 327, ch. 4, § 14
Aug. 25, 1937, 50 Stat. 802, 803, ch. 766, §§ 1, 2
June 15, 1938, 52 Stat. 691, ch. 396, § 3
June 29, 1953, 67 Stat. 103, ch. 159, § 404(e), (f)
Aug. 2, 1968, 82 Stat. 616, Pub. L. 90-450, title IV, § 404
Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-146, § 4, 27 DCR 4753
Sept. 29, 1982, D.C. Law 4-157, §§ 8, 15, 29 DCR 3617
Mar. 8, 1984, D.C. Law 5-51, § 2(b)(4), (c), 30 DCR 5927
June 29, 1984, D.C. Law 5-97, § 2, 31 DCR 2556
Mar. 7, 1987, D.C. Law 6-217, § 9, 34 DCR 907
June 5, 1987, D.C. Law 7-7, § 2, 34 DCR 2640
Oct. 3, 1992, D.C. Law 9-174, § 2(b), (c), 39 DCR 5859
May 24, 1994, D.C. Law 10-122, § 2(f), 41 DCR 1658
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 2003(q)(2), 46 DCR 3142
Oct. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 13-39, § 2, 46 DCR 6548
May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959
July 18, 2008, D.C. Law 17-201, § 4(c), 55 DCR 6289
May 1, 2013, D.C. Law 19-310, § 2(n), 60 DCR 3410

History

1981 Ed., § 25-403.
1973 Ed., § 25-115.

Prior Codifications

D.C. Law 17-201 added subsecs. (e), (f), and (g).
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-310 redesignated (e), (f), and (g) as (e)(1), (e)(2), and (e)(3), respectively; and rewrote (e)(3).

Effect of Amendments

For temporary amendment of (e), (f) and (g), see § 2(n) of the Omnibus Alcoholic Beverage Regulation Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-597, January 14, 2013, 60 DCR 1001).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(n) of the Omnibus Alcoholic Beverage Regulation Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-52, April 22, 2013, 60 DCR 6372, 20 DCSTAT 1388).

Emergency Legislation